Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 23 Miscellaneous Contracts and Actions; Statute of Frauds

Law reviews. —

For a note, “Heart Balm Legislation and the Constitution,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 75.

For comments on the right of children to maintain action against one who enticed their parent, see 1 Wyo. L.J. 194, 7 Wyo. L.J. 209.

For a note, “Recovery of Engagement Gifts and the Heart Balm Acts,” see 3 Wyo. L.J. 147.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d Statute of Frauds § 1 et seq.

Rights in respect of engagement and courtship presents when marriage does not ensue, 44 ALR5th 1.

17B C.J.S. Contracts §§ 600 to 804; 37 C.J.S. Frauds, Statute of, § 1 et seq.

§ 1-23-101.
Right of actions abolished.

The rights of action
to recover money as damage for the alienation of affections, criminal
conversation, seduction or breach of contract to marry are abolished.
No act done in this state shall give rise, either in or out of this
state, to any of the rights of action abolished. No contract to marry
made in this state shall give rise, either in or out of this state,
to any right of action for the breach thereof.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 36, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 3-513; W.S. 1957, § 1-728; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-24-101

.

Application. —

In a divorce case, a trial court did not abuse it discretion by denying a wife's motion to amend her complaint to add a promissory estoppel claim because the husband's alleged promises relating to support could have been barred by the “Heart Balm Statute” and by the statute of frauds. Dane v. Dane, 2016 WY 38, 368 P.3d 914,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Injured party's release of tortfeasor as barring spouse's action for loss of consortium, 29 ALR4th 1200.

Rights in respect of engagement and courtship presents when marriage does not ensue, 44 ALR5th 1.

Action for intentional infliction of emotional distress against paramours, 99 ALR5th 445.

§ 1-23-102.
Contracts or instruments based on right of action declared void;
execution of instruments, settling claims or bringing action prohibited.

All instruments executed
within this state in payment, satisfaction, settlement or compromise
of any claim or cause of action abolished or barred by W.S.

1-23-101

, whether the claim or cause of action arose in or out
of this state, are void. It is unlawful to cause any person to execute
a contract or instrument or cause any person to give, pay, transfer
or deliver any money or thing of value in payment, satisfaction, settlement
or compromise of any such claim or cause of action, or to receive,
take or accept any money or thing of value as payment, satisfaction,
settlement or compromise of any such claim or cause of action. It
is unlawful to commence or cause to be commenced, either as party,
attorney or as agent of either in any court of this state, any proceeding
or action seeking to enforce or recover upon any such contract or
instrument, knowing it to be such, whether executed in or out of this
state.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 36, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 3-514; W.S. 1957, § 1-729; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-24-102

.

§ 1-23-103.
Filing pleading or service of process prohibited.

It is unlawful for a
person either as a party, attorney or an agent of either, to file
or serve or threaten to cause to be filed or served, any process or
pleading in any court of the state, setting forth or seeking to recover
money upon any cause of action abolished or barred by W.S.

1-23-101

, whether the cause of action arose in or out of the state.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 36, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 3-515; W.S. 1957, § 1-730; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-24-103

.

Cited

in

Condict v. Lehman, 837 P.2d 81,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 1-23-104.
Penalty for violation of provisions.

Any person who violates
any of the provisions of W.S.

1-23-102

or

1-23-103

, is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not less
than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than five thousand
dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment for a term of not less than
one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or both.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 36, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 3-516; W.S. 1957, § 1-731; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-24-104

.

Chapter retroactive. —

Section 5, ch. 36, Laws 1941, reads: “In so far as not violative of constitutional guarantees, the provisions of this act shall have a retroactive application and shall bar all actions and causes of actions now existing and all suits pending in the state of Wyoming for alienation of affection, criminal conversation, seduction and breach of contract to marry.”

Severability. —

Section 7, ch. 36, Laws 1941, reads: “If any of the provisions of this act or the application thereof to any persons or circumstances is held invalid such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to such end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.”

§ 1-23-105.
Agreements void unless in writing.

In the following cases every agreement shall be void unless such agreement, or some note or memorandum thereof be in writing, and subscribed by the party to be charged therewith:

Every agreement that by its terms is not to be performed within one (1) year from the making thereof;

Every special promise to answer for the debt, default or miscarriage of another person;

Every agreement, promise or undertaking made upon consideration of marriage, except mutual promise to marry;

Every special promise by an executor or administrator, to answer any demand out of his own estate;

Every agreement or contract for the sale of real estate, or the lease thereof, for more than one (1) year;

To charge any person upon, or by reason of a representation or assurance concerning the character, conduct, credit, ability, trade or dealings of another, to the intent or purpose that such other may obtain thereby, credit, money or goods.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 57, §§ 1, 3; R.S. 1887, § 1249; R.S. 1899, § 2953; C.S. 1910, § 3751; C.S. 1920, § 4719; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 73; R.S. 1931, § 47-101; C.S. 1945, § 5-101; W.S. 1957, § 16-1; W.S. 1977, §

16-1-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 1.

I. General Consideration.

II. Agreements to Which Statute Applies.

A. Agreements Not to Be Performed Within One Year.

B. Promises to Answer for Debt, etc., of Another.

C. Agreements for Sale, etc., of Real Estate.

III. The Memorandum.

IV. When Statute Not Applied.

V. Pleading And Practice.

§ 1-23-106.
Gambling contracts void.

All contracts, promises,
agreements, conveyances, securities, and notes, made, given, granted,
executed, drawn or entered into, where the whole or any part of the
consideration thereof shall be for any money, property or other valuable
thing won by any gaming, or by playing cards or any gambling device
or game of chance, or by betting on the side or hands of any person
gaming or for the reimbursing or paying any money or property knowingly
lent or advanced at the time and place of such play, to any person
or persons so gaming or betting, shall be utterly void and of no effect.
No assignment of any bill, bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness,
where the whole or any part of the consideration for such assignment
shall arise out of any gaming transaction, shall in any manner offset
the defense of the person or persons making, entering into, executing
or giving such instrument so assigned, or the remedies of any person
interested therein.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 35, § 118; R.S. 1887, § 1001; R.S. 1899, § 2187; C.S. 1910, § 2860; C.S. 1920, § 3393; R.S. 1931, § 48-201; C.S. 1945, § 5-301; W.S. 1957, § 16-2; W.S. 1977, §

16-2-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to gambling generally, see §§

6-7-101

through

6-7-104

.

As to regulatory powers of cities and towns, see § 15-1-103(a)(xvi).

As to effect of illegality of transaction on rights of holder in due course, see § 34.1-3-305.

Basis for this section

is that wagers are against human welfare, considered to be of a higher interest, and are not to be encouraged. Williams v. Weber Mesa Ditch Extension Co., 572 P.2d 412,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1977).

Section declares gambling contracts void and of no effect.

Williams v. Weber Mesa Ditch Extension Co., 572 P.2d 412,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1977).

Even though gambling may be carried on without any criminal violation

of the law or criminal responsibility, a gambling debt is unenforceable. Williams v. Weber Mesa Ditch Extension Co., 572 P.2d 412,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1977).

Note void in whosesoever hands it comes. —

Under this section, providing that all notes made or entered into in whole or in part for a gambling consideration, or for money won at cards, “shall be utterly void, and of no effect,” the maker of such a note may defeat it in whosesoever hands it may come. Swinney v. Edwards, 8 Wyo. 54, 55 P. 306,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1898).

Transfer held not for consideration of money won at gambling.
—

Certificates of deposit were cashed for holder who was engaged in gambling by the keeper of the gambling room, at time when holder was not indebted for past losses, and the full amount of the certificates was paid him, but most of it was thereafter lost in gambling. It was held that transfer of the certificates was not “for the consideration of money won” from the holder, so as to be void. Kinney v. Hynds, 7 Wyo. 22, 49 P. 403,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1897), reh'g denied, 7 Wyo. 22, 52 P. 1081,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1898).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Recovery of amount of debt deposited with stakeholder, 8 ALR2d 307.

Recovery of money or property entrusted to another for purpose of lottery tickets but not so used, 8 ALR2d 307.

Recovery of money or property entrusted to another for purpose of dealings in futures or on margin but not so used, 8 ALR2d 307.

Agreement between charitable home and applicant for admission respecting compensation to home and property right of applicant as wagering contract, 10 ALR2d 864.

Recovery of money or property lost through cheating or fraud in forbidden gambling or game, 39 ALR2d 1213.

Money lent by broker for dealings in futures or on margin, 53 ALR2d 345.

State lotteries: actions by ticketholders against state or contractor for state, 40 ALR4th 662.

Enforceability of contract to share winnings from legal lottery ticket, 90 ALR4th 784.

Right to recover money lent for gambling purposes, 74 ALR5th 369.

§ 1-23-107.
Individual
liability of members of governmental agencies.

Notwithstanding W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, the members of any governmental board, agency, council, commission or governing body are not individually liable for any actions, inactions or omissions by the governmental board, agency, council, commission or governing body.

This section does not affect individual liability for intentional torts or illegal acts.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 100, § 1; 1992, ch. 53, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “1-39-121” for “1-39-120” in (a).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, at the beginning of (a), substituted “1-39-120” for “1-39-121.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Qualified immunity. —

Where a subdivision developer alleging an entitlement or right to obtain approval of his subdivision from a board of county commissioners failed to identify a clearly established statutory or constitutional right that had been violated, the members of the board were entitled to qualified immunity from suit. Marshall v. Board of County Comm'rs, 912 F. Supp. 1456, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 761 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For comments, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for personal injury or death allegedly caused by defect in church premises, 8 ALR5th 1.